apertium-srd.srd.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 51243
	Sdefs: 65
	Paradigms: 226
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix mono-sorted.dix apertium-srd.srd.dix.new

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzẮẰẴĂẤẦẨẬǍÅÅÃÃĄĄĀẢȂẠªÆḆĆĈČČĊĎĐĐḌḌḎÐÐĔĔẾỀỄỂỆĚĚẼĖĖĘḖḔĒƏĞĞĜǦĠĠĢḠȞĦḤḤḪH̱ĬǏĨĮĪĪỈỊİĲĴJ̌ḰĶḲḴĹĽĽŁŁĻḶḺǇṀṂŃŇṄŅṆṈŊŎŎỐỒỔỘǑƟŐÕØØǪṒŌŌỎỌỞỢƠƆºŒŘṘṚṞŚŚŜŠŠṠȘŞṢṢSSSŤȚṬṬṮŬǓŮǗǛǙǕŰŨŪŪỦȔỤỨỪỮỬỰƯŴÝỲŶŸȜắằẵăấầẩậǎååããąąāảȃạªæḇćĉččċďđđḍḍḏððĕĕếềễểệěěẽėėęḗḕēəğğĝǧġġģḡȟħḥḥḫẖĭǐĩįīīỉịı̇ĳĵǰḱķḳḵĺľľłłļḷḻǉṁṃńňṅņṇṉŋŏŏốồổộǒɵőõøøǫṓōōỏọởợơɔºœřṙṛṟśśŝššṡșşṣṣſßťțṭṭṯŭǔůǘǜǚǖűũūūủȕụứừữửựưŵýỳŷÿȝª</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="abbr" 	c="Abbreviation"/> 
    <sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/> 
    <sdef n="percent" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Pre-adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="predet" 	c="Pre-determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronom (Pronoun)"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Aggettivo (Adjective)"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Coordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="pro" 	c="Proclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="enc" 	c="Enclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="tn" 	c="Tónico"/> 
    <sdef n="an" 	c="Animate / inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/> 
    <sdef n="hyd" 	c="Hydronym"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Antroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen"/> 
    <sdef n="org" 	c="Organisation"/> 
    <sdef n="al" 	c="Altres"/> 
    <sdef n="pri" 	c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" 	c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pii" 	c="Imperfect indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="pis" 	c="Imperfect subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="ifi" 	c="Passatu remotu"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Past participle"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" 	c="Gerund"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="fti" 	c="Future"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence marker"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c="Left quote"/> 
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c="Right quote"/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

<pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>([.\?;:!]|[\?!]+|...)</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lquot">
  <e>       <re>[“]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rquot">
  <e>       <re>[”]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lpar">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rpar">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? *</re><p><l>%</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l>°</l><r>°<s n="num"/></r></p></e> <!-- degree -->
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l>º</l><r>º<s n="num"/></r></p></e> <!-- primu, segundu... -->
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l>ª</l><r>ª<s n="num"/></r></p></e> <!-- prima, segunda... -->
</pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Clitics -->

<pardef n="S__cantende·mi·lu">
  <e>       <p><l>·lu</l>       <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·la</l>       <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·los</l>      <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·las</l>      <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>·lu</l>       <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__cantende·mi·ddu">
  <e>       <p><l>·ddu</l>      <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·dda</l>      <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·ddos</l>     <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·ddas</l>     <r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__cantende·mi·*">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·lu"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·ddu"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·nche</l>     <r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·nche</l>     <r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·lu"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>·nche</l>     <r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·ddu"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·nde</l>      <r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__cantende·ti·*">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·*"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·mi</l>       <r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·nos</l>      <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__cantende·bos·*">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·*"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·mi</l>       <r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·nos</l>      <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__cantende·nos·*">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·*"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__cantende·bi·*">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·lu"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·nche</l>     <r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·lu"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>·nde</l>      <r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__cantende·si=bi·*">	<!-- uso de si (no reflexivo) como variante de bi -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·ddu"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>·nche</l>     <r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·mi·ddu"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__cantende·*nde">
  <e>       <p><l>·nde</l>      <r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="lpar"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="rpar"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="lquot"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="rquot"/></e>
